Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 33 IDAHO RESIDENTIAL CARE OR ASSISTED LIVING ACT
§ 39-3355. Inspections.

The licensing agency shall cause to be made such inspections and investigations to determine compliance with this chapter and applicable rules.

Inspections for such purposes will be made unannounced and without prior notice at the discretion of the department and at intervals determined by the licensing agency.

An inspector shall have full access and authority to examine, among other things, quality of care and service delivery, a facility’s records, resident accounts, physical premises, including buildings, grounds and equipment, and any other areas necessary to determine compliance with this chapter and applicable rules.

An inspector shall have authority to interview the licensee, administrator, staff and residents. Interviews with residents shall be confidential and conducted privately unless otherwise specified by the resident.

The licensing agency shall notify the facility, in writing, of all deficiencies and shall approve a reasonable length of time for compliance by the facility.

Current lists of deficiencies, including plans of correction, shall be available to the public upon request in the individual facilities or by written request to the department.

The department shall accept an accreditation survey from an accreditation commission for a residential care or assisted living facility instead of regular compliance inspections conducted under the authority of this section if all of the following conditions are met:

The accreditation commission’s standards meet or exceed the state requirements for licensure for residential care or assisted living facilities;

The facility submits to the department a copy of its required accreditation reports to the accreditation commission in addition to the application and any other information required for renewal of a license;

The inspection results are available for public inspection to the same extent that the results of an investigation or inspection conducted under this section are available for public inspection;

The accreditation commission complies with the health insurance portability and accountability act and takes reasonable precautions to protect the confidentiality of personally identifiable information concerning the residents of the facility; and

If the facility’s accreditation report is not valid for the entire licensure period, the department may conduct a compliance inspection of the facility during the time period for which the department does not have a valid accreditation report.

The department shall not conduct an onsite compliance inspection of the residential care or assisted living facility during the time the accreditation report is valid except for complaint surveys, reportable incidents, or in cases of emergencies. Accreditation does not limit the department in performing any power or duty under this chapter or inspection authorized under this section, including taking appropriate action relating to a residential care or assisted living facility, such as suspending or revoking a license, investigating an allegation of abuse, exploitation, or neglect or another complaint, or assessing an administrative penalty.

§ 39-3356. Complaints.

A person who believes that any provision of this chapter has been violated may file a complaint with the licensing agency.

The licensing agency shall investigate, or cause to be investigated, any complaint alleging a violation of this chapter or applicable rules, regulations and standards. If the licensing agency reasonably believes a requirement of this chapter has been violated, it shall conduct an inspection of the facility.

A complaint filed with the licensing agency which is subsequently released to the facility that is the subject of the complaint or to any member of the public shall not disclose the name or identifying characteristics of the complainant unless:

The complainant consents in writing to the disclosure.

The investigation results in a judicial proceeding and disclosure is ordered by the court.

If the disclosure is essential to the investigation, the complainant shall be given an opportunity to withdraw the complaint before disclosure.

The licensing agency shall inform the complainant or, if requested by the complainant, the complainant’s designated representative, of the results of the investigation and any action taken by the agency.

§ 39-3357. Enforcement process.

If the licensing agency finds, on the basis of inspections as defined in this chapter or otherwise, that a residential or assisted living facility no longer meets a requirement of this chapter, and further finds that the facility’s deficiencies:

Immediately jeopardize the health or safety of its residents, the department shall take immediate action to remove the jeopardy and correct the deficiencies through the remedy specified in section 39-3358(1)(c), Idaho Code, or prohibit the facility from keeping or admitting residents and may provide, in addition, for one (1) or more of the other remedies described in section 39-3358, Idaho Code.

Do not immediately jeopardize the health or safety of its residents, the department shall provide for one (1) or more of the remedies described in section 39-3358, Idaho Code.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as restricting the remedies available to the department to remedy a facility’s deficiencies. If the department finds that a facility meets the requirements of this chapter, but, as of a previous period, intentionally did not meet such requirements, the department may provide for a civil money penalty under section 39-3358(1)(b), Idaho Code, for the days in which it finds that the facility was not in compliance with such requirements.

Residential care or assisted living facilities may be cited only for a violation of a requirement that is specified in an applicable law or in a rule promulgated in compliance with an applicable law. Facilities may not be cited for an act that is not expressly proscribed by an applicable law or rule or for an omission when an applicable law or rule does not expressly require the conduct omitted. If the department requires a specific corrective action in relation to a citation, that requirement must be in writing and reference the corresponding rule.

§ 39-3358. Specified remedies.

The department shall establish at least the following remedies:

Prohibit the facility from admitting residents or prohibit a facility from keeping or admitting residents with a specific diagnosis.

A civil money penalty assessed and collected, with interest, for each day the facility is or was out of compliance with a requirement of this chapter. Funds collected by the department as a result of imposition of such a penalty shall be applied to the protection of the health or property of residents of residential or assisted living facilities that the department finds deficient, including payment for the costs of relocation of residents to other facilities, maintenance of operation of a facility pending correction of deficiencies or closure, and reimbursement of residents for personal funds lost.

The appointment of temporary management to oversee the operation of the facility and to assure the health and safety of the facility’s residents, where there is a need for temporary management while:

There is an orderly closure of the facility.

Improvements are made in order to bring the facility into compliance with all the requirements of this chapter.

The temporary management under this clause shall not be terminated until the department has determined that the facility has the management capability to ensure continued compliance with all the requirements of this chapter.

The authority, in the case of an emergency, to summarily suspend the license, to close the facility, and/or to transfer residents in that facility to other facilities.

The department shall also specify criteria as to when and how each of such remedies is to be applied, the amounts of any fines, and the severity of each of these remedies, to be used in the imposition of such remedies. Such criteria shall be designed so as to minimize the time between the identification of violations and final imposition of the remedies and shall provide for the imposition of incrementally more severe fines for repeated or uncorrected deficiencies.

§ 39-3359. Transfer of residents. [Repealed.]

§ 39-3360 — 39-3369. [Reserved.]

§ 39-3390, 39-3391. [Reserved.]

§ 39-3330. Advisory council.

§ 39-3340. Licensing.

§ 39-3370 — 39-3389. [Repealed.]

§ 39-3392, 33-3393. [Repealed.]